Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-2706
Statute of limitations.

Any action brought under sections 60-2701 to 60-2709 shall be commenced within (1) one year following the expiration of the express warranty term or (2) two years following the date of original delivery of the motor vehicle to a consumer, whichever is the earlier date.

Laws 1983, LB 155, § 6.